Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4639
Voter approval; time restrictions.

If the governing body of the city abandons proceedings for the acquisition of the gas system at any time prior to taking possession of the gas system or the issue of acquiring the gas system by the exercise of the power of eminent domain has been submitted to and not approved by the registered voters of the city, the city shall not initiate a new proceeding for the acquisition of the gas system until twenty-four months have elapsed after the date proceedings were abandoned or after the date of the election at which the question was not approved by the registered voters of the city.

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 16.